Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-427
Additional penalties.

Any penalty imposed for violation of the Uniform Controlled Substances Act shall be in addition to, and not in lieu of, any civil or administrative penalty or sanction authorized by law. A conviction or acquittal under federal law or the law of another state having a substantially similar law shall be a bar to prosecution in this state for the same act. If any person is convicted for violation of the Uniform Controlled Substances Act, in addition to any penalty imposed by the court, the court may order that such person make restitution to any law enforcement agency for reasonable expenditures made in the purchase of any controlled substances from such person or his or her agent as part of the investigation leading to such conviction.

Laws 1977, LB 38, § 87;

Laws 2001, LB 113, § 13.

The plain and ordinary meaning of the words "as part of the investigation leading to such conviction" limits the amount of restitution ordered to the reasonable law enforcement expenses incurred in connection with the purchase of the controlled substance for the sale of which the defendant was convicted. State v. Rios, 237 Neb. 232, 465 N.W.2d 611 (1991).

An order of restitution under this section can be made at the time of sentencing, but there is no statutory requirement that it be made at that time. State v. Holmes, 221 Neb. 629, 379 N.W.2d 765 (1986).

Restitution imposed under this section is not a criminal penalty to be imposed as punishment for the crime, but is in the nature of a civil or administrative penalty or sanction. State v. Holmes, 221 Neb. 629, 379 N.W.2d 765 (1986).

Restitution imposed under this section is not a part of the sentence; therefore, the trial court had jurisdiction to make an order of restitution after sentencing. State v. Holmes, 221 Neb. 629, 379 N.W.2d 765 (1986).

The heading, or catchline, is supplied in the compilation of the statutes and does not constitute any part of the law. State v. Holmes, 221 Neb. 629, 379 N.W.2d 765 (1986).

A defendant may be ordered to make restitution for law enforcement expenses incurred during controlled buys that were part of the investigation leading to a conviction arising from a subsequent controlled buy. State v. Thomas, 6 Neb. App. 510, 574 N.W.2d 542 (1998).